Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.110

Training.

(1) The department must provide expertise and training on best practices for state procurement.

(2) The department must establish either training or certification programs, or both, to ensure consistency in procurement practices for employees authorized to perform procurement functions under the provisions of this chapter. When establishing training or certification programs, the department may approve existing training or certification programs at state agencies. When establishing programs or approving existing programs, the department shall work with agencies with existing training programs to ensure coordination and minimize additional costs associated with training requirements.

(3) Beginning July 1, 2013, state agencies must require agency employees responsible for developing, executing, or managing procurements or contracts, or both, to complete department-approved training or certification programs, or both. Beginning July 1, 2015, no agency employee may execute or manage contracts unless the employee has met the training or certification requirements or both as set by the department. Any request for exception to this requirement must be submitted to the director for approval before the employee or group of employees executes or manages contracts.

[ 2012 c 224 s 12.]